Tennessee, session 114, HB0935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 1, is amended by adding the
following as a new part:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a county legislative body may
require a competitive bid process for insurance brokerage services if the county has
adopted the County Purchasing Law of 1957, compiled in chapter 14, part 1 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0935
003067
- 1 -